Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 4. PROTECTIVE ORDERS AND FAMILY VIOLENCE

SUBTITLE C. FAMILY VIOLENCE REPORTING AND SERVICES

CHAPTER 92. IMMUNITY

Sec. 92.001. IMMUNITY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person who reports family violence under Section 91.002 or provides information under Section 91.003 is immune from civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

(b) A person who reports the person's own conduct or who otherwise reports family violence in bad faith is not protected from liability under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.